Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 5 Retirement Benefits and Refunds of Dues

47-11-70.
Eligibility and application for retirement benefits; early retirement.

In order for a judge of a probate court or an employee of the board to be eligible to receive retirement benefits under this chapter, such judge must have:

Served as a regularly qualified and commissioned judge of a probate court or as an employee of the board for at least four years, if he or she became a member before July 1, 1995, otherwise for eight years, during which time he or she complied with Code Section 47-11-40;

Fully complied with this chapter;

Terminated his or her official capacity as a judge of a probate court or as an employee of the board;

Attained the age of 60 years;

Filed with the board his or her application for such retirement, on a form to be furnished by the board, within a period of 90 days after reaching the age of 60 years or after termination of his or her official capacity as a judge of a probate court or as an employee of the board, whichever may occur last in point of time. If the application is filed after such time, the retirement benefits shall become effective on the first day of the month following the date the application is filed unless the failure to file an application was due to a physical or mental disability, in which event the benefits will be paid as if the application had been filed within such 90 day period; and

Had his or her application for retirement approved by the board.

No judge of the probate court or employee of the board shall be eligible for retirement benefits under this chapter until he has reached the age of 60 years. Any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any judge of the probate court or employee of the board who has met all other requirements of this chapter, except that he has not attained 60 years of age, may terminate his service as an employee of the board or as a regularly qualified and commissioned judge of the probate court, may cease payments of any dues into the fund whatsoever, and upon reaching the age of 60 years and filing his application as provided for in paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of this Code section may commence receiving the retirement benefits provided for in this chapter; provided, further, that any judge of the probate court who was a regularly qualified member of the fund and who, prior to July 1, 1976, may have severed his relationship as a regularly qualified and commissioned judge of the probate court of a county of this state, ceased payments of any dues into the fund whatsoever, but had not reached the retirement age required by law at the time of severance of his relationship as such judge of the probate court, and has not qualified for or commenced drawing retirement benefits as of July 1, 1976, by reason of not having attained said retirement age then required, shall be eligible to commence drawing such retirement benefits due upon reaching the age of 60 years or on July 1, 1976, whichever is later.

Any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, service as a senior judge of the probate court, as such office is expressly provided for by general law, shall not affect the right of a member of the fund to receive a benefit.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 185, § 13; Ga. L. 1961, p. 57, § 4; Ga. L. 1968, p. 548, § 10; Ga. L. 1972, p. 419, § 3; Ga. L. 1976, p. 754, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1982, p. 682, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 312, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1037, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 907, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 779, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 410, § 1.

47-11-71.
Amount of retirement benefits; optional retirement benefits; manner in which persons not eligible for maximum benefits at retirement may become eligible.

Any judge of the probate court or employee of the board who is approved for retirement benefits as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 47-11-70 prior to July 1, 1996, shall be paid a monthly sum equal to 5 percent of the judge’s or employee’s average monthly net earnings, as may be determined from reports of such earnings and subject to the limitations on such earnings as provided for in Code Section 47-11-40, for each year served by the judge or employee up to, but not exceeding, a total of 30 years, except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section. No time prior to December 22, 1953, or for which dues have not been paid in accordance with Code Section 47-11-40 shall be considered in determining the number of years of service of any such judge of the probate court for purposes of determining retirement pay and no time prior to January 1, 1990, or for which dues have not been paid in accordance with Code Section 47-11-40 shall be considered in determining the number of years of service of any such employee of the board for purposes of determining retirement pay.

Any judge of the probate court or employee of the board who is approved for retirement benefits as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 47-11-70 on or after July 1, 1996, shall be paid a monthly sum equal to 5 percent of the judge’s or employee’s final monthly net earnings, as may be determined from reports of such earnings and subject to the limitations on such earnings as provided for in subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of Code Section 47-11-40, for each year served by the judge or employee up to, but not exceeding, a total of 30 years. No time for which dues have not been paid in accordance with Code Section 47-11-40 shall be considered in determining the number of years of service.

In lieu of receiving the retirement benefits provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section, a judge of the probate court or employee of the board may elect in writing, on a form to be provided by the board at the time the judge or employee becomes eligible to receive retirement benefits, to receive a monthly retirement benefit payable up to the date of the death of the designated survivor, which benefit shall be based on the judge’s or employee’s age at retirement and the age of the judge’s or employee’s designated survivor at that time and shall be computed so as to be actuarially equivalent to the total retirement payment which would have been paid to the judge or employee under subsection (a) of this Code section. A member who is unmarried at the time of such election may designate a survivor at the time of making such election. If a member is married at the time of such election, his or her spouse shall be the designated survivor unless another person is so designated with the written agreement of the spouse. In any event, the designated survivor shall be a person with whom the member has a familial relationship through blood, marriage, or adoption. Such actuarial equivalent shall be computed using an interest rate and current mortality table adopted by the board. The spouse designated at the time of the judge’s or employee’s retirement shall be the only spouse who may draw these benefits.

If a member elects the option provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection, then, after the approval of the application for retirement, the following provisions apply:

If the member’s designated survivor shall predecease the member, the member may, in writing on forms prescribed by the board and subject to approval by the board, revoke such option and thereafter receive during the member’s lifetime a monthly retirement benefit commencing on the date on which the board approves such revocation, but not for any period prior to such approval, equal to the maximum monthly benefit which would have been payable to him had such option not been exercised;

If there is entered a final judgment of complete divorce between the member and the member’s spouse who is the designated survivor, the member may, in writing on forms prescribed by the board and subject to approval by the board, revoke such option and thereafter receive during the member’s lifetime a monthly retirement benefit commencing on the date on which the board approves such revocation, but not for any period prior to such approval, equal to the maximum monthly benefit which would have been payable had such option not been exercised; and

If, following the death of the member’s spouse or the entry of a final judgment of divorce between the member and the member’s spouse who is the designated survivor, the member remarries, the member may, in writing on forms prescribed by the board and subject to approval by the board, elect such option with respect to the member’s new spouse. The joint and survivor benefit shall be determined as of the date of the election. No such election shall be made until the expiration of one year after the date of remarriage or until a child of the remarried couple is born, whichever is earlier.

Any provision of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any judge of the probate court, employee of the board, and any secretary-treasurer of the fund who has served for a total of 30 years as judge of the probate court, employee of the board, or secretary-treasurer, or a combination of such service, and who has contributed all dues owed to the fund as provided in this chapter but who is not eligible upon retirement to receive the maximum retirement benefits provided for in this chapter shall be entitled to continue to contribute dues to the fund or, in the case of the secretary-treasurer, to continue to receive credit during such period of time as the judge, employee, or secretary-treasurer shall continue to serve as a judge of the probate court, employee of the board, or secretary-treasurer beyond 30 years of service. The average monthly net earnings of any such judge of the probate court, employee of the board, or secretary-treasurer retiring prior to July 1, 1996, shall be added to the total monthly net earnings of such judge of the probate court, employee of the board, or secretary-treasurer during the 30 year period of service. The sum of these two amounts shall then be divided by 360, and the result of such division shall then be used as the average monthly net earnings upon which retirement benefits shall be calculated; provided, however, such average monthly net earnings shall not exceed the limitations specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 47-11-21 and in Code Section 47-11-40.

The calculation of benefits under this Code section shall apply to persons who were receiving benefits pursuant to the provisions of this chapter prior to July 1, 1988, as well as to persons who become eligible to receive benefits on or after that date. Effective July 1, 1988, the monthly benefit of each person who was receiving a benefit prior to that date shall be increased in the amount necessary to comply with the requirements of this subsection.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 185, § 10; Ga. L. 1959, p. 354, § 4; Ga. L. 1968, p. 548, § 8; Ga. L. 1972, p. 421, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 754, §§ 1, 5; Ga. L. 1979, p. 595, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1249, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 630, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1037, § 4; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2147, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 114, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 300, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 166, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1278, § 4; Ga. L. 2006, p. 229, § 1/HB 251; Ga. L. 2014, p. 179, § 3/HB 601; Ga. L. 2016, p. 354, § 3/HB 635; Ga. L. 2022, p. 187, § 1/HB 263.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, deleted former subsection (e), which read: “Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, additional retirement benefits shall be paid to each person, including a surviving spouse, who was receiving benefits under this chapter on January 1, 1993, or who became entitled to receive benefits on or after January 1, 1993. Such additional benefits shall be annual cost-of-living benefits equal to the benefit a member would otherwise be entitled to receive as calculated pursuant to subsections (a) through (d) of this Code section and any benefits previously received as authorized by this subsection multiplied by the percentage of any increase in the Consumer Price Index of the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor for all items and major groups, United States city average, for the immediately preceding calendar year; provided, however, that such annual percentage increase in benefits shall not exceed 2 percent regardless of the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index. In any year in which there is no percentage increase in such Consumer Price Index, no additional retirement benefits shall be paid under this subsection.”

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “30 years” for “20 years” throughout this Code section; and, in subsection (c), substituted “30 year period” for “20 year period” in the next to the last sentence and substituted “360” for “240” in the last sentence.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “computed using an interest rate and current mortality table adopted by the board” for “computed on the Group Annuity Table for 1951 using 5 1/2 percent interest” in the fifth sentence in paragraph (b)(1).

47-11-71.1.
Spouse’s benefits; options; recalculation of benefits upon election to be covered by this Code section.

Upon the death of any member who is then receiving retirement benefits and upon the surviving spouse of such member attaining 60 years of age, said spouse shall be paid spouse’s benefits which shall be equal to 50 percent of the retirement benefits then being paid to such member. Such benefits shall be paid for the remainder of the life of such surviving spouse. Upon the death of any member prior to retirement, the surviving spouse of such member may elect:

To withdraw the dues paid into the retirement fund by the deceased member plus interest at the rate specified by law, in which case the spouse shall be deemed to have waived any right to any benefits; or

To leave such dues in the retirement fund and to receive spouse’s benefits which shall be payable beginning:

On the date of the member’s death, if such member is 60 years of age or older; or

On the date on which the surviving spouse of the deceased member reaches 60 years of age,

whichever event occurs last, and which shall be equal to 50 percent of the retirement benefits which the deceased member was drawing at the time of death or, in the case of a member who dies prior to his sixtieth birthday, which such deceased member would have been entitled to receive upon reaching 60 years of age had he lived and ceased service as a judge of the probate court or employee of the board on the date of his death.

As used in this Code section, the term “surviving spouse” means the person who was married to the probate judge or employee of the board on the date of the death of the judge or employee.

Any living retired probate judge drawing retirement benefits on November 1, 1982, who had a spouse on the date of the retirement of such judge, which spouse may survive said retired probate judge, shall be eligible to draw the retirement benefits provided for a spouse under this Code section upon electing to do so; provided, however, that no person may draw both the retirement benefits and spouse’s benefits. Spouse’s benefits payable under this Code section shall be in lieu of benefits provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 47-11-71.

Any judges of the probate court or any surviving spouses of judges who are receiving benefits calculated pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 47-11-71 are authorized to elect to be covered by the provisions of this Code section and to have the benefits which they are receiving or which they may be entitled to receive recalculated in accordance with the provisions of this Code section. Each such election shall be made in writing by July 1, 1983, on forms to be supplied to each such person by the board of commissioners. No additional contributions or dues shall be required of any person to be covered by the provisions of this Code section. In the event that a person who is receiving benefits calculated under subsection (b) of Code Section 47-11-71 elects to be covered by the provisions of this Code section, such person’s future benefits shall be recalculated in the same manner as if such person had never received benefits under subsection (b) of Code Section 47-11-71; and such recalculated benefits shall be payable beginning on the first day of the month following the month in which the election is made.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-11-71.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2207, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 209, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1037, § 5; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 908, § 1.

47-11-72.
Refund of contributions upon termination of office as judge of the probate court and waiver of benefits; interest on dues paid for purposes of computing refunds to deceased members.

Any member of the fund, after ceasing to serve as a judge of the probate court or employee of the board and after waiving any right to retirement benefits in writing on a form to be provided by the board, may apply for and be refunded all dues paid, together with 5 percent simple interest per annum from the end of the calendar year in which paid to the end of the calendar year next preceding the application for the refund.

Although retirement pay shall be based on Code Section 47-11-71 and nothing in this Code section shall be construed to alter same, at the effective date of retirement simple interest at a rate of 5 percent per annum shall be computed on all dues paid from the end of the calendar year in which paid to the end of the calendar year immediately preceding the date of retirement and shall be added to the total dues paid. After all retirement benefits coming due under subsection (a) or (b) of Code Section 47-11-71, as the case may be, have been paid and if the total thereof shall not be equal to or exceed the above total of dues and interest, then the balance of such principal and interest shall be paid to the estate of the deceased judge of the probate court or employee of the board.

Upon application by the estate of any member of the retirement system who dies prior to retirement and who does not have a surviving spouse who is eligible for benefits under Code Section 47-11-71.1, all dues paid by such deceased member, together with 5 percent simple interest per annum from the end of the calendar year in which paid to the end of the calendar year next preceding the application for the refund, shall be paid to the estate of the deceased judge of the probate court or employee of the board.

No dues may be refunded except in strict compliance with this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 185, § 11; Ga. L. 1968, p. 548, § 9; Ga. L. 1976, p. 754, § 6; Ga. L. 1979, p. 595, § 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 2207, §§ 2-4; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1037, § 6.

47-11-73.
Retirement after disability.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary, a member may retire after completing four years of creditable service if he becomes totally and permanently disabled after commencing service as a probate judge or as an employee of the board.
Any such probate judge or employee shall be entitled to receive retirement benefits in the amount that he would receive if his retirement were effective at the time he became disabled.
All questions relating to the degree and nature of the total and permanent disability suffered by the probate judge or employee shall be determined by the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-11-73

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1249, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1037, § 7.